
lithicacity.com	
HomeLand of BethlehemThe Other WorldOf LightKingdoms of SunlightA Garden and River - Land of LightMore
Of Light
	 	

		

Of Light




Lucifer







Now then all ice bergs and ice chunks will melt, but a real philistine, they will live forever.




Now all Jews are the Lord's and all philistines are the Lord's.




Now a scoundrel has his iniquity and cruelty, but a tree is a living thing.




Now a cruel man hates him he steals from, and straight away he is gone with a shut hand.




Now an enemy soldier steals from another people, but a good man is fearing the Lord, for he does not lie in many things.




Now truth comes, and darkness yields, and the thieves are not exalting what is good, and they are taking in the profit of the noble, and the land is filled up with thieves and liars, many fools who did not honour the Lord, for early they have fallen away, and they take the profit of the noble, and they have tricked and deceived, for no love they are capable of, indeed very little, if any, and they have owed a dept of seven times for their spiritual thefts and they have not paid, and many debts of seven times they have owed, and they have not repaid. Now they are lonely people, not capable, meant for other things, and they were not saying, I will be left alone, for their reward was God, that they were meant for other things, but they have left their place immediately and have not ever known their own place to fulfill, to be patient, to honour the Lord, that they are far from the road, and not removed at all, but indeed they are in a different land than where they belong, by mala, and they are like confused people, who have never been liking God's will, for they have not even been a child. Now then the rest are wicked murderers, not those of justice, and so there are thieves and murderers in the land, and both because of envy, for they murdered and stole because of envy, because neither of these were ever children, for they did not murder as a man who murders when it makes sense, but they murdered as a jealous man. Now there is the ice berg that gives, and he is become a tree, and far better is the ice berg if it is becoming a tree, and yet the thieves and murderers, they are having no place in the land, for some have murdered to attain and others have been thieves. Now does not mala matter more, for they do not keep the commandments at a greater degree, for they have not minded their own business, these people who have been thieves and murderers and the ice bergs that give, they will be called loyal. Now unless you mind your own business, how will you judge? But if you are not the judge, do you not await the time of judgment?




Now where there are other people groups, and Jews and philistines are both having God, and it is the angel's kingdom, and all the people groups are having God. Now if the man does not pay his debts to God, he was a thief of another type, by mala, and if a man does not give honour to God, or to his mother, he was a murderer of another type. Now then be quick to pay your debts to God, less you be called ice berg.




Now Ghanima, which means king or kingship, is a determined one, for she chooses her husband repeatedly. Now she must choose her husband, who is her husband, and it is also as Leish, a thing of the philistines.




Stilgar means, zero tolerance.




Now then there are the different increments of the ten commandments, and so there are the different level of breaking the ten commandments and keeping the commandments. Now then each breaking is called rebellion against one of the laws, and each keeping, commitment, or loyalty to the law. Now then them who mind their own business and believe in God, they keep all of the commandments on every level, and with a happiness, they keep loyalty to receive their reward from God, that they fulfill the good thing which is to not steal and not murder, to not rob the Lord or commit murder when they are having understanding and integrity, loyalty, to the Lord as the leader of their house that they may be like him they give to, for them who give to the angel, they will be like the angel, and them who give to the Lord, they will be like the Lord, for they are given a part of them they give to, for they purchase a part of them, that so is the giving, that they are required to give when it is right by truth and righteousness of religion, that they must partake of a person's substance, for the giving is called communion, and it is loyalty to God. Now then when the communion is had, some are seen to be the Lord's, that they may be right to be Muslims, and others are seen as sons, that they are right to be a philistine. Now what thing they are right to be, they will know, if they are to know. Now some are right to give a thing to the Lord and yet another thing to the angel, and yet it is all to the Lord, for some are worshipping the Lord in what they perform, that it is their tithe, and they are giving another thing to the angel. Now then will any partake in communion with a wrong heart and mind, that it is condemnation for them? But you will know what drink is right for you in communion, and you will know what bread, what thing, is right for you, that you may also add to it the drink and the bread that it is committed separately, that you partake of the drink and bread. Now then it is not good to partake of communion if it is condemnation for you.




Now z means honour father and mother on Earth and father and mother in Heaven. Now it is the Ten Commandments fulfilled that each thing you fulfill for people you fulfill for Heaven. Now rob not Heaven or people, murder not in Heaven or people, covet not in Heaven or people, for there are two and eight commandments, now do not lie and do not lie about Heaven, you shall not put your mother god before your father, God, for you shall have no other gods before the Lord, your father, and you shall not put your loyalty to a group of government before your loyalty to the nation. You shall not slander people, or Heaven. You shall not make idols on Earth or in Heaven, for they are false. You shall not receive or handle or deal with a holy thing in vain, as if pointless, neither the name of the Lord, or His name that is in anything. You shall not bear false witness against your neighbour of your people, or your neighbour in Heaven, another people of the Lord. You shall not strive or attempt to take anything in vain that you will not fulfill or do not desire to fulfill, neither in Heaven or on Earth, for you shall fulfill and then speak, or so it is seeming right, that you have fulfilled then spoken. Now your hand is open.


Now first give good before you may speak, now first perform that you misbehave, but him who speaks badly and misbehaves without giving or performing, they are meldok for they also do not mind their own business.


Realm of commandments is based upon what is being honoured, that the keeping of things to God and society is met, for the rebellion against God or people is the two types of rebellion that you should love God and people. Now them who robs God murders himself, for he will melt and perish, and yet him who has nothing, he does not have to give to God. Now if he has nothing his offering is refused, for it is not right to take it, and it is considered nothing by the wisdom of the tithe, but the giving restores a stubborn and murderous stone, that he is called loyal. Now a young man usually has nothing and he does not have to give, for a horse maybe he has if he is lucky and yet he has nothing by the weight of tithe that he does not have to give and his offering is refused.




Now then meldok is the terrorism of the devil.


Now then the two pillars at either side of the fourth world do not keep anything out that he might wish to go to or bring to him, and yet they keep him on the planet? Now he releases Noah's ark onto the land, for the land was become empty, and he is also the Ark of the covenant, and he is called angel of the covenant for he is releasing Noah's ark as well. 


Now all of Dune, the six, are the angel, and everything in it, and everything part of him, and it goes out into the land in places and occurs, for some of him happens on land, and they should have no mother god before the Lord their God, who is God, the father, for even if they are honouring their mother with the nice scent of resin that they do not use to become intoxicated, and even if they should build temples for their mother, houses for her on Earth, and even if they should place their mother upon mountains, yet they are sons and daughters of God, their father, who is in Heaven, who is infinite, and all wise, and higher beyond what their mother can even understand and speak, or see, so that their mother cannot speak to his son, who is God, for what can their mother do for them? But she cannot do much of anything for them, only she can rely upon the Lord, as their mother, and they can rely upon the Lord. Now then their mother god is loving their music, their good humour, their good ways.


Now because of the golden path, which means leaf there was hesitation for the men in being angels because of the cheek of the sons and daughters, that another way was having to be found, for they would have to be able to survive, the philistines. 


Now then you must have the Lord your God, before anything. 








Fade to dark, in the hallway there's a fire they spark,

down the alley where the lost ghosts go,

in the distance where the pure lights glow, forget their name,

they are, like a well beyond a shooting star,

like a tale that only love would tell,

I am the love that was sent to the Earth,

when it was ready to start,


feel the need, they only starved and then it took their breath,

it seemed nothing was the answer left, a spectacle, of all spectacles,

lost without the day, to come,

and it seems that this go hit the ground and run,

and it seemed that we could only know,

then when the curtain falls, it will not be the rest of all of this,


I bet this time, there's a purest sign, and a real, true hope,

out beyond the sky,

and please guide me through,

if I have something to prove,

will the land vanish and move?

Will this all be true, when its begun?


A garden young, planted with a rising sun,

planted with the hope for all time,

implanted with a prophet not mine, and he read the time,

if its true then you'll know, it's something real,

but they cannot let go, of what they feel,

so it tumbles and flies, after all this, what really dies?

Immortal, we go on,


and I bet this time, there's a purest line, and a real, true, pure name,

I am the love that was sent through the pillars flame,

and it seems true, all of this goes,

to the distance, if we run out of words, if we realize,

we're right on the edge, of falling off, into the land of eternity,

and it will be you and me,

or something that we see,

or something to be set free,

or something you will then be, to find another me,

don't feel sad,

if it's only that I wasn't just bad,

if I was good, or if it misunderstood,

there's nothing there, to compare to, to find the real you, you knew,



Now then there is a mother from a mother, and he is in music, and her children are not really that which was indignant, but she takes not the philistines, for he is a prince among them, not their mother, and the Lord is their God, that they do not have Dagon before Him, and the prince, also a mother, has come prior to Dagon, and yet Dagon has indeed come far before him, for he is very old, and yet young by another standard? Now then the prince has his kingdom even, by Mala, and how can Dagon bring him back in, for he is a mother himself now. Now so his mother has cast him out, and he is right to have the Lord as his God, and he is greater than Dagon in a thing, and so Dagon cannot bring him in, but he must be cast out, an outcast, for then he is not welcome here, and Dagon cannot praise him or take care of him, for he is a mother of the Heavens, a rogue moon, not a god, but a moon. Now then those who go to him, to listen, they go to Earth, and those who go to Dagon, they go to the Heavens, and he is better at music than those who have come before, or it is my belief he is better, for he makes speachless and even praiseless with beauty.


Now then has the Christ not told his people, consider not high things, but the evil of the day is sufficient for you? Now then does not Dagon consider, they will not become cake baskets from a royal priest hood, but they are high, high things, and it is not good for them to minding the things of Dagon, them who are the priests of the body of the Christ. Now Jews keep themselves clean, and do not other people keep themselves clean? But I do not shepherd the Christians, only if they come to me, is it wrong for me to remind them of what their Lord has told them? Now it is not then not minding one's own business, for them who are the doves, yet I do not tell them to fly away, but only that the Jews keep themselves clean. Now there is nothing with Dagon for them, and it is not good that Dagon, the mighty, are keeping the good from them, to be evil doormen concerning them, for it causes discord, and it is very wrong to do, to cause discord in such a way. Now then ascend the steps, the many level of pure white steps, up to the palace, to the beautiful house of the city, and there are them, a mist around them, around the steps and the house, and there is not the royal priest hood there? But beautiful and harmless are these doves, and they flutter about through the city, through the land. Now then what is part of the body of the Christ, it remains with the body of the Christ, or it becomes a cake basket, in which case Dagon is their mother in Heaven, and they are converting to philistine, for a person can say, I am philistine, but they are converting to become a philistine and then it does not matter what they are saying, whether they say they are philistine or not, and the Christ would have been wrong to convert, and yet if any others are becoming philistine, indeed they are philistine, and they have their mother in Heaven, and the Lord their God, that they do not put any other god before Him. Now the Christ to the Hebrew Jews, is Solomon and Jonah, the son of David, and to the Hebrew Jews He is preaching in the palace, and He is more as Solomon to them, if they are understanding, and the Pharisees, not Jews at all, but imposters, criminal philistines who were cast out of their land for rebellion, gone to trouble another land, and indeed removed from even that, for they were disloyal as philistines, and they did not honour their mother, and they were wicked, and they were not honour their father, it seemed, and they were the opposite of Chonoeh, as Chonoeh, but the opposite, and the viper was too good for them, for what is against the viper? But still they took the viper, and it was a corrupted viper, to do what a viper should not, for the viper was their craftiness to do foolishness, for they worked foolishness by the viper and it was an opposite thing again. Now how have they placed the viper upon them, and yet they are rebellious, traitors, for their name is called traitor and they have betrayed for the devil. Now then they were the doormen not hired, and not hired by the Jews? But if they were not hired by the Jews and they did this thing, then what did the Jews do? Now then kill the child's caregiver, their good Shepard, when the child is not looking and has no king, and no power to give aid or to do anything? But the caregiver is not a foreigner, but he is one of them, from their own nation, and the Pharasees are foreigners, and doormen not hired. Now the Pharasees, they are even called the dung of the Jews, all that the Hebrew Jews rejected, and yet the dung was placed on high, and what could the child do? Now then put your foot on Rome, you who are Hebrew Jews? But Dagon's kingdom is far excelling Rome, and there is not even comparison. Now by pilot all of the Empire bowed to the Christ and to the Hebrew Jews, for he stooped, and so then raise up your foot and stomp his head, for the Empire was smaller than the Christ, for Christ was much bigger than the Empire, and the you will know then the kingdom of Dagon is yonder. Now then the Christ crucified Himself? But He allowed it, in every way, for they were not able to crucify Him, that He offered Himself, a willing sacrifice, that though they were able, yet he remained with the Jews, and He did not turn stones to cake basket. Now then it is seeming a private matter for humans, and not for the angel, and it is not seeming either a matter for the philistines, for it is seeming none of Dagon's business.



>>


Now the Eskimo is the son of the King who is a steward to the angel, for the Eskimo is his on, and it was the woman who was mother to the angel, who had him without a father, for she gave birth to him, and because he was an angel, from Heaven, it was so that she had no pain of labour by Ria. Now then the steward king, who is the king of a group of palaces in another realm that has been diminished by the communists, he was having a small city in a province that he was lord of, and it is so by Mala, and yet the realm is diminished because of the communists, and the Eskimo is his son, who is a prince whose friends, only by Mala, for he does not know them, are the people of the palaces, the Incel who are not the dung of Incel, who have been robbed of their realm and good things when there was a lacking and great falling into the Earth, for there was a catasrophe of the ground, of the land, and the women gathered up, obeying the Lord, doing what was right in obediance, to save what could be saved and what was right to promote, and yet the Incel, people of the palaces, they were dispossessed, and so they came to the remaining things because they were dispossessed of their realm, and they grew angry, because they received not their realm from another realm, and was it not so that God did not command another realm to be their realm? Now then with anger and frustration, they looked blindly for their realm, but they could not find it, and the angel says, yet your realm is not anymore, for it has sunk and diminished, because of the catastrophe, for you look for your realm in frustration and yet you cannot find it in another realm. Now then gather yourselves and where are the women of you? But is it not your frustration that your women are gone of you? Now a bastard woman of them, who makes a statement to support her people towards the angel, many of them will suffer and even perish more if she does this thing, for the angel is not a human, and they are different types of people, and so keep to your own business, for no ignorant statement is required to be made by you, even towards the humans who are not your realm. Now keep your voice out of my ear and the angel will bless your truth, for he will not hear it, but it will be heard by the peace, and the type of peace. Now the angel is more of an Incel to you, is he not, you men who are Incel, for the angel is not a human, and nothing of your cause reaches something as an angel, for keep your war where it belongs, that when you are satisfied, I might bless you. Now indeed your realm is needing to be restored, for there are a great many men, and almost all your women are gone, and the palaces are vacant, for there is a ravine around them. 


Now then the catostrophe of the ground collapse caused the palace people to abuse themselves with prostitutes, to grow insane, to be smashed with the cliff rocks of another people, when they came to them, to have meldok smashed into them, and so they have even abused themselves in other ways, to call themselves ugly, what has its type of beauty, for they are rocks of a palace, precious stones of a palace that is rich, and they perceived not their own bueaty anymore, for the palaces were abandoned. Now why has this evil thing happened to them? But they are good, and yet they have been brought to a ruin of a level of mala, and they are without a city, a homeland, and the ground has collapsed and there is a ravine around the palaces. Now they have a different religion, for they are the same as every other people, and yet they place great emphasis on some things that other people to do, only with different ideology, different religion, and they believe in another way of attaining the same things that other people too attain, and desire to attain. Now then they have the different religion and they are indignant among another people group, for they are scattered among the other people groups, and they are attempting what cannot be, to mantain their ways, and yet other people groups do not follow their religion, for they are indignant and dispossessed, for the catastrophe happened to them, and none aided them, none gave them a thing. Now then how will any judge them? But they are not being so horrible, are they, that you cannot bear them, for they were rich, with goodness, and having good things, and their realm was suddenly ruined and them outcast and scattered among the people. Now then how powerful is Dagon? But Dagon must realize what he can do, and how far he can go, and God will have to do the thing, for they must be able to have God's restoring their realm for them, and yet have they sinned? Did they commit some great wickedness that the catastrophe happened? Now it is not righteous to ask a people to repent, if they have not done much to repent for, for it is demanding wickedness, and it is not good. Now then their women speak truth, or they speak truth considering their own people, when they are cursing the men of other people groups, for they do not lie to flatter, for they indeed speak truth concerning their own people, for they are Incel women, and they too are meant to be with them, for what some of them have called women, they mean women of other people groups, and not women, as they would speak of their people's women, for their own women, why would they curse them? Now then will you not consider compassion, for they too have their pride, and it is not wrong. But then consider that though there has been dung that neither group is unwilling to flush, yet the Incel are not them, for open your eyes to the desert light, and see that you may be a good neighbour to your neighbour, the Incel. Now not all are strones of Esua, that are wicked, and meant for Niagra Falls, and as for the dung, yet it is dung that is the problem. Now then when any considers a thing, the dung is not considered, for there is always dung, and the dung must be flushed. Now then where have their wives gone, them who are Incel? Now what has happened to their women, for are the Incel not a type of Jew, and they would be good if they had their own realm, still, and no people on Earth have caused the catastrophe of the ground. Now then your neighbour has suffered a catastrophe, the palace people, and the stones that are of value, and they have born philistines, who must go with the philistines, and they have born other people groups, as all people do, and they must go with their people groups, for the segregation of mala are happening after a person is born. Now so it is called omnipotence of people, that different people groups are born to different people, and then they know what is their people group, and yet the Incel have had difficulty with this thing, for they are always expecting the same people group from them, and the philistines are elitist. Now then be always a cautious people, staying back, permitting when they are another people group, for is it not part of Christ's teachings? Now then the Incel make profit, things of Solomon even, part of their religion, for they are Jews of a type, and the father of the Eskimo, he is lord of the palaces of them, when there is the Eskimo, and it is a small city. Now they must gather themselves, segregate, rebuild. Now then pay a small tax to the father of the Eskimo, the tax of a small city, and the Eskimo portion can only be taken from him, by the Eskimo, for if he gives more, the more will be rejected, for he cannot take more than the portion of the Eskimo, the prince, less he do injustice. Now then your mayor king is he, the father of the Eskimo, and he is as a friend you have elected as a people, for you are a small city, and you are well known, many of you, to each other, and some not known to others. Now it is so in mala, that it be on Earth as it is in Heaven.


Now then there were those attacking, which is often the case, because of their sub concious, for they desired to join, for they have the right to assemble and protest, for they desired guidance and to join and to receive their portion, for they were hasty, most of the people of Earth, it seemed, and some came by themselves and attacked because the thing was not there for them to say, they wished to join, and so it is called the gift box, and they go to it, even go inside it, and they are lifted up beyond it, over it, very high, and emerging they are joined, having received the acceptance of them to join, for it is placed in Mala, and it is on the path of all roads to Dagon, except those who are in the river of fire, who must receive the number of the beast again. Now do not consider that road or mind it, for it is not worthy considering. Now all the roads that lead to Dagon, for Dagon is the opposite of Rome, and better than Rome, for he is Emor, which is the name of the capital, the roads of it lead to the gift boxes along the way, the pure gift boxes, that initiate what has already been mostly done, that they may come out with the blessing and the things they must buy, and what God requires of them, to be a thing with Emor, the city, or the beautiful countryside of it. For some are to be soldiers, business people, ambassadors, religious people, and other things, and the Lord owns the Earth and the solar system and has the right to take His planet. Now then the leaders will not drop to knees, but only lower to one knee, for they do not bow, but they stand up higher in such, that they become greater in such, for it is with greatness and a strength that they lower to one knee, which is to stand finally, for before they did not stand as much, and they say, we receive crowns of kingship for our bands of palace service when the Lord is taking his planet, for to drop to one knee is to increase by a multiplied degree, for if you understand, it is not the burning of fields, but the increasing of every crop in the field, so that everything remains and is increased more, for everything is lifted up higher, and only the dung goes down further, and then where was the dung, if there was any? But all the dung has vanished, in a moment, and all the dung is gone, for it has never been, and there was no enemy of Dagon, from one part of the Earth to the other, and only the polytheists were rejected, for the core of their religions is demon possession, and wicca was not astray when Dagon was come, for wicca was intended for the philistines, to be part of the Bene Gesserit witches, many of whom are men. Now then if any comes with his heart for Emor, and yet he does not know how to join fully, that he might attack, or become annoying, yet Dagon is having no enemies, by the Lord, because of the Lord, because all people are the Lord's, and they may join by way of the gift boxes, and they will then seek to know from Heaven, what they must buy for themselves and what they are meant to wear, and what they are meant to be, for they cannot be more if they are not first fulfilling what they are at that time, that they are meant to realize, before they are becoming more, for promotion is not in vain, in Heaven, but those who fulfill are promoted, for the Lord is just, and He is your father, that you have no other god before Him. Now then you understand that Dagon receives from your father, who is God, who is in Heaven. Now then if any is a traitor in his heart, that he is tempted to Dagon, yet the treachory is already complete, and the real treachory was prior, when he was attacked by another people, to perform for them. Now so go to the gift box, the Feirilor, and be receiving, for it is in Mala, for remain until you are blessed fully, and you will say, I have the right to do good work because the Feirilor has done it, for so you will say to Dagon, that the Feirilor has hired them without Dagon's knowledge, and God is greater than Dagon, and God is the father of these things, for Dagon receives from the Lord, the father, who is God. Now he will come and then turn his back to Dagon, after he has spoken in a good way, and he turns his back to show, he defends Dagon. Now then all the Earth has One Father, and all the Earth has One God, and Dagon has No Enemies.


Now that when dung is really remaining, if there is no dung? But the only dung remaining is that dung which is infested with demons, partnered with demons, and with the devil, for they are all infested with Meldok or else they are not dung. Now then if the dung is infested with Meldok, also, too, the polythesists are infested with Meldok, and they are remaining, for Dagon does not persecute them, for it is a buffer, that there is balance, for to make the Earth too clean, it is believed it may cause decay, for the polytheists are not persecuted by Dagon, and yet they are the devil's. Now the core things of their religion is demonic possession, for they do not know they have taken evil spirits into them, for they are offended by the opposite of what is offence, that they do not mind their own business even in their own nation, for the land they are on belongs to the Lord, and they are not paying a tax for the Land to the Lord by a religion of the Lord's. Now then every person is commanded by God in many things, to be doing what is good, and they do not have the right to be offended, them who are with evil spirits and do not know.


Now out of hell Dagon is stealing many of them, those who could be brought out of hell to be with the Lord, and yet them who cannot be brought out because of their deeds, they will not be able to be brought out. 


Now then when a nation's people war with themselves, divided, it is often because there is a thing not in its right place that meddles. Now the thing believed to be insignificant, was significant, for it is a small knife that brings trouble to the body, a very small knife that brings much trouble.


Now a chaotic, reckless divider of the people, they have full awareness and commitment to what they do, for they do not panic, and it does not happen by ignorance. Now these are the small knives that stab, and with enough stabbing, a nation is killed almost. Now it the consideration for Cessus and Cias.


Now the chaotic, reckless divider, they are dealt with by the priests of wellness, for they are them who panic and behave as if the sky is falling to divide the people, called random destructive panicking, a severe impulse problem that is conflated with severe anxiety and confusion, and sycophantic delusions of grandeur, which is the anxiety disorder that is sycophantic towards society without any purpose that could be provided, or consideration of reason, whereby the behaviour is only destructive towards society in a sycophantic fashion that displays meldok in inappropriate social settings where laws of hate speech would apply if hate speech was conducted in these settings. Now these things are not existing, and yet they are proposed for the wellness of the people, for they are too much fertilizer for what is good, and it is better that people are not being given too much fertilizer when it is not right for some. Now then it is still God who knows what is right for you. 


Now then let them be diligent, Adonijeh, for Absolom, he is one of the two bases of the angel, and it was not Absolom who wrestled with you. Now then be diligent to pursue them who are meldok, when they have been so that they are understood to indeed be what meldok, that you not allow meldok to do as pleases him, but you remove him to the priests of wellness and with diligence, for the good are angry that you do not pursue justice and good, and the others, that you pursue justice and good. Now there is nothing popular, nothing glamorous to be liked or admired, good or bad, among those who are dung or retarded, who are scoundrels, scumbags, and having the type of illness that is communion with demons, for there are not many of the illnesses that are communion with demon, only the priests of wellness also handle these. Now only remove the daughter of Babylon and these things will not be attacked any longer, for the pursuit of demons is good. Now as for those who are not being wicked, who are minding their own business, why should any of them be pursued by you? Now does not dung cause sickness? But if it causes unwellness, then do you not consider pursuing rather the dung? But if you do not have time, yet still is it not better to wait and see, for dung is even being terrorists at times, for they will use what you do against the good.


Now meldok is also with retardation, usually, and yet not always, for it has the low core IQ. Now them with the low core IQ, they are them who are having meldok, for meldok is the low core IQ, that he is found even with the seemingly good.


Now then meldok tresspasses where he does not belong, for he does not mind his own business, and so if you are removing all of meldok from the Earth, indeed then you will have the peace that is only taken for granted, for what great thing will you have? But you will not have a great thing, but only what is taken for granted. Now if the nation has then been apathetic, careless, lazy, that there is much meldok, then you shall need a great broom.


Now then both Caref and Abishag, I am liking, and though Joseph Biden is guessed to be a philistine, yet do I support either Biden or Trump? But only it is understood that God has worked a great work, and does He not always work a great work? Now there is an intense Ocean above the planet, churning with great power, moving continents, grabbing them at all times, opening their mouths, for the God conspiracy is too great for me to take a scoop of it with my hand, and a small amount, as small as a mustard seed, it is able to lift a whole mountain, shatter it and throw it into the sea. Now they prophecy without knowing it, they work evil that works good, and they pile up and other things are piled up to riches, and God is able to cast away, and to give, and he is able to move the heart of them, to judge, and some are in a river, for the Lord has made things that might be discovered, has He not? Now has He then wanted them to be able to know? But there are then so many levels, or it can be guessed, and the angel does not know, and He is all powerful, working His great work, and the madness of the heart, it is meldok if it believes it will deceive God in some plan, for the mystery is ignorance of man in such things, and so what do the principles do, and what of the principles of the devil, the king of Assyria, perhaps, who is a principle of a beast? But should the beast come, the king of Assyria, will you not identify that the beast has come, and will you not fight the beast of the King of Assyria? Now then as for the beasts of the devil, how many there are, the angel does not know, for what are the beasts in other lands? Now then diligent and wise, do you consider the identification of demons, those that have been written about, when you are studying the nation of you, whether it is an enemy nation or not? But look not at the patterns, the reports, and consider not the tests of seeing what occurs to a thing by the time it has reached you? Now why would it even be considered that you do not perform these things regularly? But these are standard things. Now if they are attacking things of functioning, do you not consider, it is a foreign enemy? But loyal are your citizens, and citizens are loyal, for the name of a citizen is loyal. Now gather up Meldok and you gather two thirds the foreign enemy. Now eradicate the criminal gangs, and you remove two thirds the foreign terrorism. Now America can indulge what Eretz Chadrack cannot, for Eretz Chadrack is not able to indulge what America indulges. Now by their repenting for the wrong slavery, they were remorseful, for their hearts seemed to owe a great debt, and so they would not close their hand in justice for anything, for all of it closed again to the thing of slavery, and so when their hand was open, they permitted much for which there was not guilt, and most was not what they had guilt for, and the guilt was only for slavery. Now the debt has been paid, and with the generation prior to the angel it was already over and paid, for the repenting generation was remorseful, and there are one and another generation, and the evil of the day is different than what they dealt with, for all the matters are different, and many roles have been retired, of the roles of society. Now then to do such things for recreation, is insanity and as drunken people knocking over things in the street.


Now then time is different for some things, for if the next thing has not even happened yet, as it is with some princes and women, then do not meddle that you do evil, for it is not wanted by any yet. Now if the prince was raised with money, then be patient, for then it is not a thing for meddling yet.


Now if a person is the size of twelve people, are not twelve people required, a beast, who is evil, or a thing of such? Now then it is not considering a skirmish. Now there is the hand, the ears, and so on.


Now then life is offered, for the life of the Noah's ark is offered, for where was there any person with a life on Earth, who really had a life? But life is restored by the ark of Noah, and it goes out, the life must flow, for it flows from the land, Mars, and it flows to all the continents, for it should, and indeed is there not a bond for a time, for those who yearned for life, for excellence? 


Now the angel is in the Temple, and the Christ in the palace, and the stones are able to become cake baskets, the stones of all people, and so if there are stones to come to Dagon, then let them be converting if it pleases them, and they will have the Lord their God, and know that their mother god is provided for by their father, who is God.


Gil Anderson, king of the yard.

Peter, the rock

Ruth, Rennie, there is a tunnel of light and it is unknown if the name Ruth has been taken.


Now the Earth and the Universe is the Lord's and they may not decide, regardless of any thing they do, to be rebellion towards God if they would even want to, who is Emperor by mala of Eretz Chadrack. Now then Abishag is on Earth, and Ceref, of Corrino, for he is called Ceref by me, and the prophecy is already completed, all of it, for by the time it was discovered, it was completed, and only the advice and council was remaining. Now the advice and council was the aid in building the Temple, for the angel is the Temple, and the philistines the things of it. Now then look, my sons and daughters, for though you might surround Jerusalem as a curtain of fire that goes to Heaven, yet do not meddle with them or divide them, for meddle is considered dividing them, that you do not attempt to divide them from their leader, the Christ, and as for defending the royal priesthood, yet do not be overly defending them if they are ever to be defended, for it causes discord. Now some are for fighting, and it is a mighty house also, and for those who should not defend, either, they should not strive in anything, for some are not right to be defending, and every person is minding their own business, knowing their own business and where it goes, not murdering, fulfilling tithe if they are of sufficient having to tithe, for it saveth them who tithe, and so then pushing up the moon, that you push it up and it is held up, that you know you are sons and daughters of Dagon.


Now then if a Jew is having dross repeatedly, he or she must be a philistine, having already brought to be a philistine. Now then it is not bad thing to be a philistine. Now then if they are still not really a philistine, then they may be a Jew again. Now did not David fight for the philistines at one time?


But meldok is them who commit terrorism and then call for the soldiers to defend them. For they are insane and outrageous. Now easily replaced are they, and what wickedness they must have already committed and to the peoples who have been around them. Now these care not even for their own children, much less the children of others. Now then the confession comes from their hands, that their hands speak the tale, what they do not do, or what they do, and with their tongue they gather up the righteous, some, to become part of their delusions of grandeur. Now them who are deceived are not a king, for if meldok is king instead of a king, if any is deceived, they are not a king. Now meldok calls for blood to satisfy his heart, and he places chains around the righteous who would join him. Now he is a low thing, a scoundrel, and he is the dung of man at his best and greatest. Now the king seizes truth only, and yet meldok seizes confusion. Now then men must not fear him, for he is a traitor, and from the garden comes others who are capable of his place, for he has committed, no doubt, much treachery and wickedness before. But place your foot upon his neck, for he shakes instead and trembles with his wrath, for his head is full up of blood, and indeed it will burst upon a field.


Now then stays back from the mountain Harkonnen if you are not a Harkonnen, or at least an Atreidis, for the Atreidis are the least of these who the philistines, of the elitists. Now then the angel is a Harkonnen, and the Atreidis are from the Harkonnen and they are not enemies, and Trump is a god, in ernest, of the philistines, for be not an ignorant people anymore. But Trump is the King of the Harkonnen, for there is none greater than him, and to the philistines, a god, being an Uncle of the people. Now then because the angel is also an atreidies, because of Absolom, the shin, then it will be said to Abishag, do not consider it, for you are a Jew, and yet part of the land, called Dune, meaning the land, for only Trump is greater than the angel, in terms of greatness, a type of greatness, and it is also that Trump is a god of the philistines, for there has come another god, an Uncle of the philistines. Now then Joseph Biden must be supported, and yet it is still better, with guilt, that Trump is becoming Priest King of the river of America, to stand upon the mountain. Now Joseph Biden, but is he a prince of Saturn? But the angel will not distract him, for he is what he wishes to be, for he may not be kidnapped, and he is called man of the hour, for he is still young, for his mother would actually far older than him, and yet they are not accustomed to religion.


Now Joseph Biden cannot approach the angel unless he is praised as lost son returned to Saturn, for he is not outcast or rogue, if he is a son of Saturn, and yet he is Atreidis, for he is a Paul of Saturn, an Atreidis, and there are other Paul's, and Abishag is a younger thing than a Paul, an Alia, for she came after Paul, and she is an Atreidis, and she has been part of the Atreidis house even though she is a Jew and not born to the philistines, but born was as Alia, and so she is an Atreidis by Alia, and Leto, something as Absolom, only Absolom is the lesser, he is in the realm of the Abishag, and Abishag has nothing to fear ever from Leto, and yet is not the Baron too great, it seems, at times? Now then the humour is there, for the Baron is not like the Baron. Now then it is a prophecy already completed, for all of it is the Dagon, Saturn, and it is called Mars instead of Saturn. Now then why has a Jew such as Chonoeh, been the prophet who aided the building of the Temple, for Saturn is a Temple, in a way, and the angel himself is the Temple of the Hebrew Jews, Jerusalem, for the angel's hands are the Muslims, for his hands are not commanded by him, nor can they be forbidden by him, but his hands are the Lord's, and the angel is the Ark of the Covenant, the Diary, the ark of Noah, and the angel is the Temple of the Hebrew Jews, and the angel does not meddle anymore with the Hebrew Jews, for the Hebrew Jews are not his, and the angel does not anymore condemn the Pharasees, for they are not his, and it is not his business, and the angel cannot say, my kingdom comes, for the Temple is part of the Lord's kingdom, and the Hebrew Jews are not his, and they are not right to look at him as their king, for the angel is the Temple.


Principles of understanding,


It does not matter if a person is aware of why they are doing something with a goal of strategy, or if they unaware of why they are doing something. Therefore the two are equal, and it is irrelevant to mention whether there is strategy or they are unaware. The sub conscious knows what they do not.


If a person is an animal of a type that should not be petted, you should not pet it, and if you are in the wild, you must accept some of the blame for petting it, for the animal will surely attack. Now then do not speak to an animal that should not be petted good or bad.


Now then there is more guilt for an animal concerning Jews than for a philistine, for there is not as much guilt for an animal for a philistine, for the philistines are elitists. Now a philistine must consider nature when they are in the wild, and yet if an animal must die, still it must die.


A philistine does not blame as much the servant, if the sender of the servant, or giver to them, is more to blame.


Now then the word servant is not used for my house, because the lowest in my house is a great thing compared to all other things, for they stand upon the mountain ledge and can hardly see them, the people, who are so far below.


Now them meant to be another thing, with another group, their sub conscious will not sometimes let them give attention to what they should perform, for they cannot perform some things, for it is not jealousy, or being a jack ass, as they call the thing. Now then the jealousy is because of another thing, for the waves crash against the rock walls, for they are not jealous, and jealousy is irrelevant, for it is always irrelevant.


Now a jealousy problem is actions that are not minding a person's own business. Now it is when they are not jealous, often, that they are a problem, for to be jealous and controlled is not an evil.


Now what is within justice for a person is not called jealousy, and it is even right, that some things should be performed.


Now a natural brute beast is extremely over the limit and yet speaks and behaves as if doing nothing. Now the beast, it should not be among the public.


Now for one man there is the shame and another man, the shame and moral blame, and so lay not blame morality to them who are condemned, if they are not those receiving the rewards of shame and morality, for only a gurney hallack is able to attain some of things too unspeakable to mention, and also if they judge and do justice it is according to their own morality that they easily fulfill. Now then a soldier who arrives very late, they are sometimes worthy to die, and yet if they are not a soldier, do they deserve to die. Now according to what they are, sometimes, there is shame, and yet according to what a person is, sometimes there is not even shame. Now give not what a person cannot fulfill, for it is the same as a person who pushes a man from the ledge of a mountain, for he will fail to walk upon air, and he will fall and it is almost as murder, and indeed sometimes it is even murder.


Now then, you will not pet a wild animal that should not be pet, if you are a man or a woman, for speak not good or bad to them, unless they are speaking to you, or you are having to speak to them. But be weary if you will speak to them, prepared, for they are an animal that should not be petted.


Now be not offended if a person believes, early, that they are only being weary, for is not everything part of the environment in some way according to a ring?


Now be not turning the preaching of religion to dung, for turn no religion to dung, for dung does such.


Now sentience is for sentience, but a seal is for below the ice.


Now many believe they can control their actions, but at a level they cannot control their own actions, for at a level, too, a sane person is an outrageous and insane person, and so they must keep their place or be removed, for by being peaceful, will they not be given more if they are found to be worthy? Now so, do not kick up with delusions of grandeur, for it is not even kicking up.


Now then if your nation will ration, communism, to build up soldiers and build up government things, that it become abundant in this way, then to return to capitalism, indeed it is a strategy to consider for some, for it is called rationing.


Now then not all terms are the same and can be used the same, for to use the terms persecution delusion in society if a person should use it they are them who has what they say, and yet to use the term delusion of grandeur is not often a person who has what they say concerning another person. Now for to wage war on the enemy is not the same as the soldier who attacks a civilian.


Now them with delusions of grandeur, the only thing they have of value is their children, but him who has much of value, is he not of a spirit that will regard others in truth?


Now the term jack ass is not a profanity, but it is a type of horse that the angel likes. Now the jack ass will not often go into the mud, and it is good, and yet he will not always drink and then it is cursed, and he will save society from being destroyed by the pillar of fire, for indeed without him, yet the angel would go over your lands like a pillar of fire that is as large as a hurricane, but because of the many jack asses, the land is safe, and yet the horse called jack ass will not always drink water, and then he is cursed and the female horse of the same, she will not always drink, and yet she is shown leniency more. Now the jack ass is a beautiful horse to the angel, and the angel likes him, if some curse him sometimes. Now then you who curse him too much, yet he is not yours, is he, if you are cursing him too much? But has God not made him so? Now a horse will drink but it will go into the mud if not for the jack asses among it, for they are a beautiful horse.


Now yet an arrogant jack ass of fertilizer is not a jack ass horse, but it is the dung of the jack ass. Now it is for spreading upon the field, and its smell kicks up, and so bring it not near to the angel less you be found guilty, for the angel will not take any gift from you, for it is a curse, and you will be a rebel if you are not innocent in such. Now then before you set out for the Temple, consider what you may not take with you, and what you must leave at home, for consider it well that things might go well for you, and that the Lord might be pleased or find you acceptable.


Now then be not as David, who permits base things to be brought to the angel, and to be in his area, for the angel is above Saul, and Saul is still king.


Now then if David will be philistine, he must be a Samaritan, and if David goes with the palace, he must be David, for he will be as an angel, a very different thing, or he will be as he was in ancient times.


Now the angel believes, it is better David is coming with me, to be a star in the sky from man, and not from Heaven, to be an angel from man, or considered an angel, almost, for they should be considered to be as an angel, for it will not be wrong to say they are an angel, that it should probably be better that David is going with me if any of him are willing, for they will receive the training, the teaching for them, and they will spare the offender and kill the real offender, and they will go seek out the offender who was innocent by the belief of the Jews, and seemingly without reason, they will kill them, that they might be called justice of the Heavens, of the level of Dagon, and not the justice of the level of Earth, and between David of the Jews and the Sarmatians, the land will be brought on high and be safe. Now then you will not bring to the angel anything that is not worthy to undertake the training, but you will sacrifice some of your best to the angel, not bringing any unworthy thing to him, for the Sarmatians will be considered better than the David of Jews, and they will go in different ways, and they will be at Saturn, as the philistines are at Saturn, for they will not be at Earth, for the Earth is belonging to people, the Jews, whether Hebrew or not Hebrew. For the temple is also a thing of Saturn and the Earth, it is the palace, and it is also, if any canopy is removed, every canopy will fall to nothing, and the Earth entire will be in ruin. Now so the Incel, and not the dung of Incel, are right to be given their realm. Now the proper balance must always be, or there will be environmental catastrophe, and will cause a multitude of wars, when it has rippled out, for it spreads like disease, and it ripples out again from society, that it ripples out even to wars for you might have the sight of the angel to aid you. Now delusions of grandeur, it is dung, and it is contagious, for it spreads very quickly and infects, and so then wear always the mask of integrity, my soldiers who will learn, that you are not even swayed by the delusions of grandeur of anything on Earth. For every king has this mask by being a king, and every soldier must have this mask, or they will be for the drill instructor.


Now the seal accustomed to people, people may even pet it and not be attacked, and yet a seal from the far away places of the arctic, it is as if very angry, and indeed it is, for be weary that there are these seals that have swam from the far places.


Now the angel has found the Earth in the midst of a catastrophe because of the rippling out of the Incel, for the Earth collapse much in the realm of the Incel, that they became Incel, and so the angel, who is part of the environment, is the effect, another effect, that seeks to calm the catastrophe that the balance might be again.


Now again, meddle not in the environment where it is not in your domain to be meddle. For if it is not your field, your garden, your buildings to build, yet meddle not in the environment, for you have not places one finger tip, one toe, upon the education of the other realm of environment, for the environment has come again more from Noah Ark, from the angel, and even only a handful of the mountain range, of the knowledge of it. For you are not capable ever to weild the angel's staff, and the angel not capable to weild the things that belong to the Lord. For be not a blind, ignorant, and foolish people, and keep your lower things away from the angel, that do not know better, that play where they are not permitted. For you are a people able to know decency and to have wisdom, that you not be called primitive and ignorant. Now indeed you can cause great collapse of the Earth entire by meddling with the angel, and the angel is not a thing of politics, or anything, but he is a thing of the environment. Now they will be called wanting the destruction of the Earth, global terrorists, who meddle with the pillar of fire, for if they look upon it to speak, their head shall be turned to dung and rot, for they contradict themselves to offer opinion, and by this you will know what is lower than where you have placed it, and possibly much lower. 


Now then if the pillar of fire cannot hear you, only it is not offence, but you have committed no evil, at least by the angel's judgment, only you have the judgment of the Lord, who is God, still and He may judge you still, whether you do innocent. Now then the Lord is your God, and the Lord is also His staff, the pillar of fire.


Now the sun is in Sion and Zion, and Jerusalem has its own sun, and Camels are the sheep of the angel, rams the goats, and for a time the angel is the moon of the Earth, and Mars is given to the them who gain the fief of it, and Lucifer is with Harkonnen, and then with Atreidis. Now a Sarmatian is greater than a Paul, and yet Paul is for the sons of the philistines who are not warriors, for Paul learns the wicca that also has God, for wicca was not astray, but it only lacked God, and they, the witches, they are beloved, and they are of Saturn and not of Earth, and these women, they are beloved, and as the moon of Earth they are, only at Saturn, and yet they must have God as well to be at Saturn, and God is their father, and they are not Jews, but they are philistines. Now then a Paul is not a soldier, but it is for the sons of the philistines, if any should attain, and the sons who are soldiers, they are angels, which is potentially far better, and yet there are Pauls who are more advanced than some of the angels who are not yet attained. Now does not the Lord bring them up, for He is their father, and does not the priest of Anothoth's, that priest, as he should be called, does he not also bring them? Now praising people in their given language, were you priest? But understand they may not translate yet and yet you praise them with what is your nagging offence? Now then will Dagon invent a language you cannot translate to priase you with all the day long? But you are not even mine, and you have praised me, because of Anothoth? Now where will you be banished to, if you are banished again? But if you are banished from the realm of Saturn, where will you go that it is your own fields? But will hell take you for a time? Now may the Lord support me in this thing, if you are exceeding and being reckless beyond the limit, for what prism has your praise passed through to praise them in their given language? Now then so be it for now, for the sea waters rise because of the coming of the fourth day, and they must climb or be called wicked and stubborn that they perish, for they must advance, all of them, for the sea water gives them no option, and where is Dagon, standing back at laughing at them if they are too foolish to understand that they must climb? But sympathy and sorrow if for them, for if there is a lash, yet it will save them from hell and ruin, and it will save their societies, for demanded is the sacrifice of some of their better soldiers to be Sarmatians, that they become angels from man, and so mock the leader who believes it to be an option, will you priest? For they do not see the sea water where it is, that it is already risen much and is still rising, and they must climb for the coming of the fourth day, for already the feudalism is more advanced, and their ignorance praised it as less advanced, and already the day has come, the sun has risen, and the philistines are judged by their standard, for more is expected of them, and more reward and ability, and them who will not advance, they will be devoured by the sea waters, for a sacrifice is demanded, and it is only an example, for all must advance, and already the day has risen, and they are in the valley still, and they can be seen debating and trying to understand, and some of them are contentious, as if an angel is a person trying to bully them. Now there will be much land after they climb. Now I bring Joseph Biden up by a gentle rope, not evil, he may not see, and he will be saved by hand, as a Shepherd who collects a favoured sheep in the mayhem, for he need not do anything good or bad to be saved in some things, only he should not consider testing the Lord, for he too should take his rewards, for it is grievous to me that he should be devoured by anything. Now his name at Saturn is man of the hour, and it is not a thing of offence, but praise. Now the leaders who would be stubborn, they will all be given a free ride, to be saved, for all the leaders of them will be saved as a given, and yet the others cannot be saved as a given, for it is only for the leaders of nations, and not even for leaders of provinces, for they are not being blamed for anything with concerns to the sea water. Now though they will be saved as a given, yet they will not be having the benefits of the advancement of learning, and they may learn later, for they may be too busy. Now lifted is every leader who would be stubborn, to a high place, without the advancements, as a given, and yet if any of them are being infested with meldok, they may fall as a demon, and to hell if they fall so far, for they are not being saved as a given, and yet they are, for if they are meldok, the gentle rope will go around their ankles and they will be pulled up as a person who hangs from the ankles, and it is not good. Now the meldok will fall from them then, and yet it is a more brutal thing. Now do I boast of the future? But if they mock, if they blaspheme with wickedness, then there is only the waiting for the sea water which is rising even more. Now because it is God, yet I do not mock. Now then close your eyes, good sons of mine, for you will be lifted, and do not be afraid.


Now then be not exceeding the outcast from a worse place to where you should be, that you might become an angel, an Anothoth angel, for she has his great multitude of children, and the men who are angels, they are upon Earth, where their holy places are, and they are Dagon, of Dagon. Now the princess of the dawn, the Bene Gessirit witches, the wicca that has also God, she has no children in the Heavens, the six do not, for in the Heaven only Anothoth has children.


Now when she is leaving her place, to be willing to kill dung, she is travelling from Earth to Dagon, and she will yeild, turn the other cheek. 


Now then when she is an angel, she will be learning all, even, and she has her realm, that she should remain with the angels of Anothoth, for she will have her realm that she is able to discern.


Now then there is z and it is all the law of Moses upon the different and higher plain, and the philistine knows when the day of rest has come and he keeps it holy, for his days may be longer than for others and their days. Now then he may say, it is the Sabbath, and so others will know.


Now then the things of the Jews, yet they are not all things of the philistines, for the scripture in the given language, it is not right for the philistines sometimes.


Now even more segregation are required, for it is the golden path principle, that the people are born and then they must segregate to avoid abuse, for another people will call some of them sick and intolerable, and so they must go with their own people. Now the people of the palaces must stay with them of the palaces, and always every person is minding their own business, for to not strive is only milk and not steak, and to mind one's own business, a thing of milk. Now then then what cannot go with its own people, to mind its own business, that cannot cease being unruly and wicked, that is horrible and despicable, and cannot be cared for in any way, that is worse than an animal, these are worthy to be killed. Now then all other things are able to be at peace when there is segregation, and racism is the respect of other people groups and their culture, and bullying, it is bullying, and unjust words, it is unjust words. Now then perhaps one percent was not worthy to live in some place, with its own people, for the whole Earth was able to be at peace. Now then a philistine must see well, and what he should not pet, he does not pet, and where he does not go, he often does not go. Now thus is the ways of the philistine, and they are elitists. Now then fertilizer must remain upon the field, and so ignore it, and yet you do not learn in vain, but if there is too much fertilizer there is a time for shepherding, for tending to the farm. 


Now because of most of Damascus, the Eretz Chadrack people are sometimes called Fremen. Now they are most often those below the ice.


Now then if a man can carry out conversation in a society of honour, if he is not killed with a knife by the honourable, then he is a worthy man, a person of worth.


Now there are the sicknesses of fertilizer, and they are a group. Now they are not really jack ass.


Now then why is any surprised if there are demons in the land, and they are abundant and the people are having them and then not having them, and getting them, and they are disappearing? But they are as contagions that are quickly killed and they are gotten again. Now then they spread much and they are quickly killed. Now them who are possessed by a demon, the disease has greatly not been gotten rid of, and it has spread, and it has possessed them. 


Now the Sarmatians are vigilante soldiers, angels from man, and they compliment the soldiers of David, for they are able to find what is likely a terrorist. Now then the fremen are a type of Damascus, and yet they are not actually learned in combat as soldiers.


Now Kushwa religion is the selfish version of everything, even judgment and the wrath of it.


Now then a fool may come from Kushwa religion and the ideology of it as they are tested in life, and also the lack of integrity to believe and to hold integrity as what is to be valued.


Now then the compassion man who only has hate, actually, he plays the role of others in his ways, and suddenly he explodes with rage, for he hates truth and he becomes a terrorist. Now he is called special.


Now then a Judas is a type of wickedness, for it is what betrays the whole Earth.


Now them, those things who bite, who cannot cease their biting when there is no cause, are they not being afraid and with fear?


Now brave people, do not under estimate how many are not brave and how far their lack of bravery is.


Now there are those with greater wealth, but no tongue, for they have no respect of the prince, for a slave gathers wealth.


Now great wealth without tithe, is one who will not take their reward, but the man who tithes keeps his reward.


Now be not cursed as a scoundrel, when you shall fall from being a just man, and a righteous man, because he do not pay the Lord what is owed.


Now great gravity attracts more asteroids, for by greatness they are gathered.


Now integrity makes a man.


Now let the Fremen learn combat, for there is the alternative society that comes with Dagon's kingdom, and the Fremen are learning the knife, the working people, for they are worthy to have the knife when they are reached a level. 


Now there is that which cannot do any war or speak against unless it is meldok, for there is no problem and none is offending their realm.


Now there is that which should not speak the given language, for nothing they say is with reality. But they may speak to those who are upon their plain.


Now where there is no reason, all is meldok.


Now a group of meldok is sometimes Judas, for he is a group.


Now Dagon's kingdom is also the alternative society that is truth, and those too great for the world, that the world rejected, they are in Dagon's kingdom come to Earth, and it is the Lord's kingdom, and it recognizes all truth.


Now them who do not restrain their dog, if it would attack, they are not much better than their dog, and sometimes no better, for they are the same, but them who restrain their dog, even cast their dog out from them, they maintain their good place.


Now then you may not be a lazy people in performing some things if you are them who would have a great place, for those who have nothing have no need to tithe, but them who have, they are saving themselves and keeping their reward by tithing. Now them who only has a horse, yet they have nothing by the standard of tithing, and yet them who has wealth for a family, they are them who have need to keep their reward according to their wealth. Now so all of their wealth, everything, it is maintained by the tithe, that they purchase their reward and that they are able to attain more. Now if any gives too much that it causes evil for them, then should they not be giving less then, that it might go well for them. Now then if the hand is not open still, that they may become greater, indeed, are they not giving too much? But there is them who are great that they can move a mountain.


Now what is David? But the Christ is his son, and still king, for David is king, and the Christ, in another way, in Heaven, is his Lord, his principle. Now the Christ would be king on Earth of His kingdom, and David has his own kingdom. Now Dagon comes taking portions, for them of the soldiers who really believe in the diaries, that they are true, who are soldiers, they are them, whether the best soldiers or not, who are the portion that Dagon takes, and they are very religious, not as the soldiers, and they compliment the soldiers, for so is what Dagon is already demanding, and at present, with politeness. Now they will be angels from man, indeed there is none on Earth as moral as them, and they can commit no crime. Now what is among them? But there are kings among them.


Now the kings among the Sarmatians, the angels from man, they are kings of the Christ's kingdom, and they are always recognized by the Sarmatians, for they recognize no thing more than kings. Now a king is not a man, but they are more than a man.


Now all the training of the Sarmatians, it requires no combat training, no thing of combat, for nothing of combat is part of their training, for from David they receive all things of combat. No each is a general, and each is a soldier, and each receives no orders, and each is advancing the religion, and each is able to teach, and each is even a religious figure. Now without weapons they train, and without weapons they are tested, and always they are advancing by carrying out their experience in what places they learn, and no weapon they use and no combat is required of them, for the philosophy of them is to be always without combat, and where they use combat, it is from David. Now holy men they are, and caring more the religion than for things of soldiers, for they receive money from the soldiers, and yet they are not part of the military, except in name. Now they require nothing, no nation, no aid, no money, no support from any person on Earth.


Now if there are them learning the laws as they act, and them learning the language as they act, indeed they are deaf and blind.


Now then it is a shame for a person to become slave to slaves, for it is a thing of disgust and great shame for the person, that they have a long journey, and they have need of a priest and to dip themselves into the pool to be cleansed, and they will go into the pool a number of times, for they must be cleansed, for they have even be servants of animals. Now then to roll in the hog's dwelling is better.


Now then him who advances your burden, frees you from punishments of folly, that you may live and inherit and be blessed.


Now there will come a time, by Dagon's kingdom, that you will no longer speak of things as Incel, or neo nazi, but these things will have no meaning. For you will say priest, or some other thing is it, for the Incel is a collection of many things, and there is no contradiction in the diaries, but the different things of them is named, for they are all true, the proverbs, according to what portion is mentioned in the diary.


Now then the only portion of the Incel that is people of palaces, it is them who are not animal, slave, or dung, or even devil worshipper. Now the portion that is people of the palaces, they are called the palace people by Dagon, and they have the beauty of mala. Now what they call look maxxing, it is a thing of palace people, and it is right for them. Now they must resent the angel, for he is a pillar of fire in the desert, for it is loyalty for them, and the prince, the Eskimo is in the palaces, son of the lord of palaces of that realm. Now what is called misanthropy, it is being a snob for the palaces. Now false kings of the communists, they are not right to recognize, and the things below the ice they are not right to recognize much, for they are not below the ice whether born rich or not, for they have all been born rich by mala.


Now the people of the diaries, they understand all things better, for they recognize by saying demons, and such things, and they are able to understand better, that the given language stumbles much with the words used and the false categories of it and confusion and chaos comes much, for they give themselves a broken leg, and they make themselves to be of a great disadvantage.


Now then has not the Lord placed the sign? For has he not given all things as a sign for all things, that for everything that is true there is a sign in nature, for even evolution may be a sign of the promotion of climbing and attaining stupidity, the better levels, that it is the promotion of the Lord, who is God. Now then if the Lord has created billions of years prior, and if he has placed life on Earth billions of years prior, and if he has waited, waiting for the signs to be fulfilled and to be completed, that all the signs up until that time were in preparation for man, then indeed will you not listen to the evolutionists, those who study the signs of this thing while they do not believe in God? But the atheists, it is their domain, such a sign, that they study that which is before man, and you are able to take what they study, for do not believe the atheists to be evil if some of them are being overly zealous, for if some of them have meldok, yet it it not most at such a time. Now then the Christ has perished to life, and the signs took place and in preparation even, prophecies, for the pillar of fire, the staff of the Lord, and the staff of the Lord sends out a wave from the Ark of Noah, for life is sent out as a wave.


Now then the Emporer, Nye Baker, he supports the cause of the priests of wellness in that if things are working as they are supposed to work, than he supports that people are doing what is good concerning meldok and the demons, for the priests of wellness will be wanting that they are cleansing themselves, and they will be offering advice, for the priests of wellness are for the good of society, that the land might be good for all, including those who are ill in some way. Now then if people have been around those who are diseased, who spread illness by their wickedness of the disease, for the time of judgment is over, who are dung who are spreading sickness of dung, for dung is having illness, than the priests of wellness are not then saying, but others have been spreading illness, for indeed it is an apathy of Adonijeh that it has been spread, and yet still the person sick must become well, for do not panic, and do not be with too much worry and concern, for it is a frightening thing to be going through, and yet it is not your fault, and you must be well, for though others are ill, yet you must be well, regardless of others, and Adonijeh's apathy, yet he must be rebuked when the time comes for him to be rebuked for allowing disease. Now then if you are considered to matter that the priests are wanting for you to be well, indeed, it is the same as the burden of being the son of a very wealthy man, for the son of him is tended to more. Now then if people are doing the opposite, and they are hating society and Adonijeh and the priests of wellness, that they are being those who are sick, who are angry, and who say, yet others who are well should be going to the priests and not the sick who should be left to be as sick as they want, to spread decease as much as pleases them, then the Emperor does not support the priests of wellness in this thing that any should be going to them because of the protest and terrorism, even, of the sick who are indignant and who hate society as it would be good. Now then the priests of wellness, yet do they support themselves in such? But have they not been deceived by an unruly gang of the sick? Now then it is good when Adonijeh is taking the truly sick to the priests of wellness, if they refuse, and yet if an unruly and rebellious gang is protesting, that Adonijeh is taking the well and not the sick, or that Adonijeh is not knowing of the unruly who have been spreading decease, then indeed the Emperor supports them who have been good, who are them who have right to be taking much from the unruly and sick who were protesting against society because they are sick.


 

Now how is it that there is him, a thing from Heaven, that is a tribe prince of Judah who does not fight as Judah fights, or so they believe it is the case in their assumptions sometimes, and yet all of Judah is below him, and he is even a pillar of fire? But so the enemies of Judah, of a tribe of him, a clan of him, they have assumed that the prince does not fight? That the prince does not fight and does not have the same respect? But the prince who apparently has no parents, no support, no allies, no protection, is even, indeed, even a bastard to the enemies of Judah, he is actually having more than Judah in terms of protection, of might, of protection from soldiers? Now how strange it has been then, for Paul has the protection of David and all his soldiers, and yet Judah, it is away and doing what is does, and has the tribe prince even spoken to him, to any of Judah, or does he know any of them? Now then, Judah, your enemies are angry with you.


Now them who cannot function with the addition of a fish, them who cannot function with the addition of a piece of wisdom, a thing of wisdom, they are them who choke upon their meal.


Now then choke not upon your meal, but eat and drink. Now then eat not dung, or you will likely become sick, and quickly.


Now then who are these who cannot understand them of much Judah, who are seeming misunderstood by them who would be wise? But indeed they are not misunderstood, for there are them who are much with Judah, and they are righteous, often, if you will be waiting, or is it not easily understood? But indeed it is understood. Now then, as for the other palace people, people of palaces, them not called Incel, do not be alarmed by him, for there is peace, but where your king is not among you, what can you do differently? Now there are kings among you and you have your king, and princes, wise men, the houses of you and your many houses, and garbed in soft garments are you, and yet the greatest enemy, even with enemies, is always dung. Now then who is the lord of the lord's of palaces? But then if he is in Heaven, and you on Earth, then it is the steward kings, for all kings are steward kings, for above them is that which is in Heaven, their principle, and above them is God. Now the principle of David is the word, the Christ. Now is not the Christ the principle of the lords of palaces? Now these are cities that are great and they are in their nations. Now the angel was great that he came from the apparatus, anything required, and was born by virginity to a woman, and the Eskimo, only he is the son of the lord of palaces of a small city. Now the angel was not truly human, is what should be written about him.


Now then what spirit is it that has opened a mouth with the speaking against itself? 


Now rob in mala, and you are robbed seven times the amount, and teach by example, by committing wrong, and your punishment is multiplied than if you had committed wickedness without it being teaching, as it would be a lie to say it was for teaching.


Now then from the infestation of meldok is occurring addition of delusions to be added to the delusions, for they are all of meldok.


Now then a dog of meldok is a doberman, or a German Shepard, or some dog that is called not fit for society, for it is dangerous at times, and the priests of wellness are having to handle it.


Now then wicca, if it is religion without saying God, then do they not then say God? But the atheist of religion, they are wicca. Now then if there are the Benne Gesserit witches, the Benjamins, then some are then believing in God as witches.


Now then if there is the coming of Dagon, will there not be the coming of the Lord, and will there not be New Jerusalem?


Some are not in control of their actions. They will not because they cannot and so they do what they have to. 


Now then if some are servants of the devil, they will not do what is right because they cannot and so they do what they have to, even with their reasoning.


Now then those who love truth, they love God, and they will not cease because they cannot, for a good thing are they.


Now there are those who go to terrorism, and they make war without fire and without that which alerts soldiers, and they keep their war to such tactics, for they consider they will win with greater time, and the mightiest of them they would murder, and the most brilliant they would murder, and they carry out their patient war that they will wage their war in such a long way. Now then it is the other type of cold war that seeks to make serious war as war on land with fire and with swords and with the horror of open war. Now then open war is upon them, and they must fight with violence at times for there has already been open war, and there are those who claim there is no war in any way, and that such war can never occur. Now then the Emperor says, it is mandatory to protect the genius who is really a genius, who is capable, and that it is disloyal that they are not protected, and it is mandatory that Adonijeh is diligent with concerns to those who are possessed by meldok, for meldok does not mind his own business. Now then the war is fought with diligence and the methods of diligence and peace, with patience and with diligence, and there are some who are having to resort to violence and those who are able to rely upon the diligence of the soldiers of cities and the diligence of others. Now then do not be afraid to remove people, for where the waves go out, there some are found with meldok. Now where debate is found, remove that which is found with meldok, for the waves will go out many times and there are opportunities. Now them who are wanting to catch the enemy, they will find them with waves when there is tests. Now then what portion of traitors are taken by a man or a woman? But if she takes fifty from an area, she is worthy of silver and even gold, and it is not a thing of rewards. Now then if they resist every easy thing, and if they are being contentious when it is simple for they are a stumbling thing to them who fight, always slowing, always contending about what is plain, then soon they are left to wander home, and soon they are removed from their people. Now then they are called Americans in Eretz Chadrack, for they debate what is not debated, slowing and being contentious, believing they have no duty that requires diligence and aggression. Now then increase aggression to take whole buildings, leaving only a few. Now them who are wanting such are for catching every enemy. Now then Americans are for America, for there they are loyal. Now as for the princes, those who are really princes, yet they are having their right place, and yet there are many false princes among you. Now then if any is philistine not philistine, is it not a false prince?


Now then the Fremin are gaining the knife when the knife comes to them by fulfillment of advancement, for when they are worthy to wear the knife, then they are worthy as a person who able to wield it with great ability, and who can be trusted to wear it. Now then a Fremin is almost always, with only rare exceptions, a person who was born and raised below the ice, and who is a working person who works with their hands in some way. Now they are Damascus people and they wear dark garment.


Now the false prince is him who is cheating at morality because of his lack of integrity concerning jealousy, for he only lies with all judgments, and indeed he is not having the substance of a prince, for he is a thing that is not, a corrupt and wicked thing, an abomination to some princes, a just weight unbalanced, a thing not believing or disbelieving in God.


Now corrino is not conservative or liberal, for it is not political. 


If they have not decency they will have a chain, for them who has not decency will have a chain.


Now a Fremin is having to be them who is of the same ethnicity as the angel, for the angel is not able to make anything of the other shades, and they are having to learn things of combat.


Now the river comes for some to be enslaved, and it goes to the place of being enslaved, for they are in such a river. Now perverts are they in a fashion, and they are not able to mind their own business or keep to their own realms.


Now them who erode and corrupt and make mud from the stone structures of the truth, of the religion that is true, they are mud, for a mud slide they are and part of a mud slide.


Now then hear not and regard not the mud slide.


Now Nephtali has its promised land, and the angel is not as great as God to like Egypt in any way, but a slave of the dark shade, they are of a people that does not even deserve a name.


Now then what does the story of the Carthaginians mean? But when you sin against the environment, when it is a pillar of fire, you sin against yourself and your own house, for a pillar of fire is the environment. Now then some cast their children in the fire, and will the hand of God, a hand of Him, take their children to the Heaven? But they are more than testing the environment, but they are doing what is a sick madness and an abomination, for the Lord has made the environment the way it is. Now then if any has fulfilled the dairies, yet they will not need to say it, for if they have made the dairies, then it is without saying, for them who fulfill a thing, then it is known. Now then Dagon has no hands, for the hands are the Lord's whether they are Muslims or David, or some other thing, even Judah, they are the hand of God. Now then if you would even consider sinning against the angel, you are considering injuring yourself and sinning against yourself, for do you not know the environment, and the Lord's judgments, you who are people, or some other thing that is lower?


Now him who is proud in blindness, it is more of a thing that should not be out of place, and there is fertilizer proud in blindness, and yet it must remain upon the field.


Now then only put things in their right place, lift up and place higher what should be put higher and place in a different place what is low that has been put up on a shelf to be odious. Now always with good you do so, not being impious if it is not required, that you only peacefully place things where they should be.


Now then rebellious dung, it is not evil, and yet it is for the field.


Now rebellious gold is only wrestling in good, and there is nothing there that is seeking the evil for what is also gold. Now let rebellious gold be with the angels, for are they not with the angels? Now then fear not, but you are deemed worthy to wrestle and do good, hearing the rebuke, as a man who is worthy, for nothing seeks your life.


Now among you, the angel will likely perform if you perform, but if you do not perform, he will perform elsewhere.


Now then a wealthy man who tithes, he performs, a soldier who does combat, he performs, an artists who gives some art, they perform. Now such is the giving and the commerce of gold in the Heavens.


Now religion is the life of a nation, even the atheist is part of life, and the atheists are the great gate and wall of Zion. Now then should you not protect the wall? Now large and vast is the realm of Zion, a large city, the size of a great city of the Earth.


Now the Islands are believing there is no justice anywhere, that they are as isolated as their own nation, that there can be no justice, and it is not so, and yet they are Islands for some reason that cannot be explained.


Now not all who are on the Islands are traitors to the people of land, for some of them are greatly heroic, and have they not known of the evil, that they are heroic?


Now there is a different type of Duncan Idaho, and indeed he is great.


The slave who is wickedly attempting to be judging princes among the people, they make it so that to depart from evil makes them that they might be attacked, for it must be, and it is considered, that it is because of slaves who are taking to judging the people when none has said, judge the people. Now so then it is the anxiety and the fear of slaves that they are panicked that they judge and they make their slide like disgusting things into places where they do not belong for concern that the people will see them and place a chain upon them and keep them in the slaves houses for work. Now so as they have been saying, the people will be like animals, so they will be judged, that they are concerned and with worry that they act, and so then act upon them, or it is the good judgment for them, for if there is no justice, yet there may be more justice because of it, and for if there is no man, yet there will be more men if there is no clumsy meddling, or so it is the good judgment, and yet you are not able to perform these things, for Adonijeh has crouched in wait, has he not? Now then is it the thing of Isaiah fifty nine that you are without justice that there be possibility for even better justice? Now then are you not able to place a chain upon a slave? But if there is no man, yet there is a man crouching far off, and he will come if there is better justice, that he is being an abomination for such, and he is coming when there is better justice, that he is wicked, for he keeps the land unjust and comes when there is justice. If such is the case then indeed it is a wrong thing, for there can be no benefit from what occurs, for greater good cannot come from injustice. Now then deal with strategy with the man who would come, and so then be able to have greater justice because of the lack of justice, and so then you will be able to place a chain upon the violent slave, the unruly beast, for every slave is assumed to be a serial killer if they were free. Now so is the right judgment, for a religion, and yet it is only an example to you, when such a time comes, if it is right, and it is permissible, that you at least have the judgment of religion, and yet there can be no command for you, for it is religion and no more. Now then if it is not permissible for you, then you must rely upon Adonijeh.


Now there are the Arks for highly valuable wild life, the zoos that are spread out throughout society where highly valuable wild life are kept that are giving the signs of things, for they are often signs, and only the demon possessed disturbs and cannot shut their lips or keep from being seen when they are among the wild life. Now these are the Arks, and they have the priceless things that cost close to a million, each, to take care of over time because they are the signs. Now then what has enemy military been doing carrying out very cowardly tactics for, concerning some of these zoos? But if a foreign enemy recognizes the tactical advantage of having these zoos, then why is it that Judah does not? For there will be messages in the air for Judah, and messages for David, and what will occur? But then it is always for Judah, for it occurs, that they are ready to take to the capital, and yet we wait for Judah. Now how long they wait may determine whether there is guilt, for Judah was wanted to be more, and yet a stubborn coward is with iniquity. Now then there will be the kingdom divided by the angel, for the working man and society, he will be a kingdom that can protest and refuse acceptance, and the priests and Judah, they will be a kingdom that cannot protest and refuse acceptance, for David is king, and so when the priests are accepted, then it will be so that they will be divided from the working man, the fremin, and then they will be free to openly be priests after the meeting place has accepted them, and if Judah does not act, then if it is a long time, and he is stubborn and wicked, then what will be the reward for Judah? But Judah shall remain, and him who was stubborn and wicked, what will be? But have the wisdom, Judah, to understand the value of the zoos? For they are part of society and they are required for signs, and the angel cannot study without these zoos. Now then understand the value of everything that our society has? But it is not the business of Shem, even, if there are slaves among the fair shade, for he must wait, and he must recognize the time and that he will be taken care of as is good after many things have been accomplished. Now then it is not a former time, but it is the kingdom of Dagon, that none should try to follow the things of a former time, for many of these things were wrong that happened, that they are not for the present time. Now then Judah is part of Dagon, also, and a portion of David will be taken by Dagon, if David is willing, and already they will be the Emperor's if it is fulfilled that they become the Emperor's, that the Shogun, the Prime Minister, he will have power, and the elite soldiers will be called the Emperor's and the Fremin, they will learn combat. Now is not the Lioness, the queen, is she not the Lord's cat? But the staff does not know what the Lord has, and is not everything, really, the Lord's. Now then the priests are never the slaves of the fair shade, only they are already Levi, and yet they are dealing with much wickedness, and if they will learn, they are able to learn, and even the Emperor will consider the teachings of the priests that are for the fair shade. Now then the people are not priests, and yet it is good that the people are remembering decency considering the priests. Now then the priests of wellness, they are tending to the Emperor's favourite sons and daughters, for it is them of greater value who are being taken by the workings of mala to the priests of wellness, for a worthless dog is not tended to often. Now then the favourite sons and daughters need remember that most often, unless they are disloyal, the priests of wellness have much concern for the well being of the Emperor's sons and daughters, and they are charged by themselves, heavily, to be having much concern.


Now going to the priests of wellness, it is frightening, and yet be learning quickly that it is part of society, for the stupidity of fools has sounded obnoxious in the past concerning wellness, for the society of Bethlehem, it is more advanced, and not all can keep their temperature what it has to be. Now then they are the priests of wellness, and it is part of society, even for the princes who have grown up with much wealth. Now a soldier must oversee every prince of David, the groups that are princes, for he will be David, and he is for the keeping of integrity, for Cessus requires it.


Now the peaceful work with the military, and always they are governing their realm while the soldiers carry out their plans, for Eretz Chadrack is the best at this, and will be, for it is an elite nation, beyond the norms of other nations, for they are even as the three hundred Spartans, the extreme of the metaphor, and so let them abandon all burdens that are for lowering the standard, that are for lack of excellence, and so there may be peace makers and peaceful, who offer truthful things that they always fulfill, for the reputation of the nation and its further power is dependant upon the fulfillment of promises, so that he who makes these promises unfulfilled betrays the nation. Now then always they are making peace, providing as much peace as possible, always bettering the places they occupy, always remembering the respect of other religions and cultures, always gathering intelligence by faithful promises and commitments of faithfulness, always gathering support and allies by honesty and a commitment to honesty and faithfully fulfilling promises, so that them who say, do not honour these people, they are speaking violence towards your nation, you who are peaceful, who are for gathering allies, and them who say, do not be so kind, they are saying, lose the war for your nation. Now it is as Lucifer, these groups, and it is as a perfect light of peace and prosperity, and faithfulness and good, and so the optimists will be making preparations for a great empire of peace and prosperity for all allies and all that is around, so that a gift shall come, and with the gift the fire of eradicating the violent from the land.


Now then Eretz Chadrack must go its own way, or it must be able to be without America in most things, that Eretz Chadrack will be a place of majesty and it will establish peace for the entire Earth, and those nations that will not join with peace, they will be as pillars in the great hall, and they will be ignored, and all the nations that are not those pillars, they will be with Eretz Chadrack and there will be peace, for Eretz Chadrack will be known, if it is not as apathetic, to be the place of excellency, of always the greater excellency.


Now then fertilizer is good for the early crops and yet it must remain upon the field, or else it is meldok. Now then if fertilizer is meldok and it gathers and goes out to commit wickedness of terrorism, then none can escape, for it is without reason, and it is against the whole of the Earth.


Now then peace will be the empire, and it will be all the nations that are not pillars, that resist, for it will be all the nations that do not exercise the arm with might, that rather wish for only the peace of prosperity, and it shall be then, also, for Latin America, that they will be part of peace, and it will be for Europe, for Australia, for those places that do not exercise the sea lion, that do not have a sea lion.


Now then the Lion and the sea lions will wrestle with each other, and they are the pillars of the Earth, and what is not the pillars, it may be filled with light, the light of perfect peace and excellency, that they may be as Eretz Chadrack, also, if it pleases them. Now there is the proverb of the angel, and it is for the angel, that them who will not climb, who will not perform, they will be devoured by the sea water that is always flooding more. Now the sea water continues to rise and the flood of it is ongoing, and they must always be climbing and they must be receiving their blessing, for the blessing comes to Earth, and the blessing comes for all the remnants, does it not? Now every place that is not a sea lion or a Lion, it may be a cloud of peace and blessing, and those places may be as Eretz Chadrack, and they may be what pleases them, either capitalism or communism with religion. Now they will call their nations Zion.


Now what nations are being powerful? But is it not America, China, Russia, and India? Now are not these nations pillars? But as for the rest of the Earth, they may be a cloud of peace and they may be as Eretz Chadrack if it pleases them.


Now if they are not great sufficiently, there is problems, and they say, we have free will, but they cannot bring themselves to, for there is not really jealousy. Now then people cannot disobey in some things, for they cannot exceed themselves to do more good than is their place to do, for they must wait for another.


Now any person who can do much good for the angel, they are proven to be great, for if they are small, yet they are small upon a high place of a mountain.


Now him who believes in the key problems of others as if they were really key things, making them part of himself, that he believes they are key things of all those he hates, he has meldok, and it is a willing thing of him, for he believes in many things that are not upon any ground, upon anything, and he is a thing of dung, hardened and sculpted, for he chooses dung rather than truth, and where he is believing himself with greatness in a thing, he is really upside down, for he hangs by the feet, and the blood has gone to his head, his own dung has gone to his head, and his head is filled up with blood and his own dung. Now speaking upside down, he speaks and his hands do the opposite of war, for they do wickedness and not valour, whether they call him brave or not. Now cursed is he, or she, and they do the opposite of what is just in all things, for they hang by the feet, and their head is filled with their own blood.


Now a jealous man who perverts stories, it is not the act of a scholar that he does, but it is a hidden thing, at times, behind a curtain, for it is in the Temple of the hateful devil, and behind the curtain is a jealous thing of envy and murder.


Now them who make clouds to Sodomize, to be a danger to others, to be clouds of meldok and what he is, they would hope to do combat by such things, for they are not scholars of stories.


Now them who wish to poison the clouds, yet it is not reported. Now then if they wish to poison the clouds, yet it did not happen, and it is not mentioned, for it is as a foreign enemy.


Now Beulah means forsaken, and the angel does not know.


Hephzibah means good land, or even good tiding. 


Eretz means sought out, finding, seeking.


Chadrack does not mean, not forsaken.


Hawat means great.


Thifur means goodly.


Behold means not forsaken.


Tofet means money.


Hinnom means dark.


Sophrim means sorcerer, or type of witch that the angel does not know about and yet it may be devil witch.


Tarshish means fool.

Likely the hands of a person.


Ufaz means work.


Eretz Behold.


Sharon means garden.


Yam means covet.


Lev means love.


Choshech means great thing.


Ohr means light.


Melachim means kings.


Banim means protest.


Banot means child.


Iyim means angel. Angel mercy.


Oniyot means peace.


Zahav means gold.


Nechoshet means brass.


Avanim means iron.


Kesef means neclaces.


Wood brass and iron stone.


Barzel is a type of stone.


Ohr Olam means light perfect.


Yarei'ach means light glow.


Dor vador means for steps.


Kavod means kindness.


Kavod Hashem means friend God.


Dahm means blood.


Sheker means perversity.


Avlah means lewdness.


Leshon means tongue.



Yad Hashem means Day God.

Kaved means right.


lev (heart) divrei sheker means heart deceitful perversity.


Eloheichem means angelic majesty.


Mishkevot means bed chamber.


Nekhochah means prudence.


Bnei onenah means children of the moon.


zera mena'ef means zealous kid.


zonah means sun.


Yeledim means righteous.


Peysha means stone.


Zera sheker means zeolous pervert.


Elim means oak trees.


Now Yeledim might be a different type of righteous.


Wadi means fertility.


Cheleck means reward.


Goral means beauty.


Zevach means music or tune.


Nesekh means blood.


Minchah means kingly.


Delet means devil.


Mezuzah means Doorknob.


Zikron means lust.


Shemen means gifts.


Sheol means the pit.


Melech means god king.


Derech means dire need, way.


Chayyat yad means Power life.


Lev means heart.


M'Olam means My Lucifer.


Kibutsim means collectors.


Kodesh means angel.




Behind the delet also and the mezuzah (doorknob) hast thou set up thy zikron ; deserting Me, thou hast uncovered thyself, and art gone up; thou hast enlarged thy mishkav (bed) and cut [a Brit] for thee with them [fertility cult idols]; thou lovedst their mishkav (bed) where thou hast looked on their yad [i.e., phallus].

9 And thou wentest to Melech with shemen thou didst increase thy perfumes, and didst send thy envoys far, even down unto Sheol.

10 Thou art wearied in the length of thy derech; yet saidst thou not, It is hopeless; thou hast found the chayyat yad of thine; therefore thou wast not faint.

11 And of whom hast thou dreaded or feared, that thou hast lived a lie, and hast not remembered Me, nor laid it to thy lev ()? Have not I held My peace meolam, and thou fearest Me not?

12 I will preach thy tzedakah (cause, catastrophe), and thy maasim (type of spiritual thing, assumed, milk, breast milk), that they shall not profit thee.

13 When thou criest for help, let thy kibutzim save thee; but the ruach shall carry them all away; hevel (guilt) shall take them; but he that putteth his trust in Me shall inherit eretz (city), and shall inherit My Har Kodesh;

14 And shall say, Build ye, build ye, prepare the Derech, remove the michshol (stumbling block) from the Derech Ami (path of light).

15 For thus saith the High and Exalted, Shokhen (Lord) Ad (Of) Kadosh (angel) Shmo (creator); I dwell in marom vkadosh (Heavenly victory of Angels), with him also that is of a contrite and lowly ruach (pity), to revive the ruach (pity) of the shefalim (humble) and to revive the lev nidkaim (love of goodness).

16 For I will not contend lolam (Lucifer), neither will I lanetzach (frequently) be in wrath; for the ruach (pity) would grow faint before Me, even the neshamot(word) which I have made.

17 For the avon (type of iniquity likely with covet, covet) of his covetousness was I in wrath, and struck him; I hid, and was in wrath, and he went on shovav(mudslide) in the derech(way) of his lev.

18 I have seen the drakhim (love, even being wine) of him, and will heal him; I will lead him also, and restore nichumim (petty comforts) unto him and to his avelim (household, stronghold).

19 I create the fruit of the lips; Shalom, shalom to him that is far off, and to him that is near, saith Hashem; and I will heal him.

20 But the reshaim (wicked) are like the troubled yam (Ocean), when it cannot sheket (stir), whose mayim (blessing, peace) cast up mire and mud.

21 There is no shalom, saith Elohai (Great God), for the reshaim. (wicked one)





If she is what is mentioned here, she is clearly a philistine.





The vocabulary that is used seems to be very large, for there are many different words that refer to the same noun but are in fact different. The context too might matter to change the meaning of a word and it is possible that the prism is used for humans that translates everything to a lower plain where they are understanding a thing such as the prism like Chonoeh, that translates to the given language, only not the opposite. Also the translation of the angel is when a thing has already been fulfilled, what they are then in that case. Duncan Idaho is a very high thing, and higher than the angels of Dagon, most likely, and at most times and cases, and yet the things that must be with the Atreidis house might be finding themselves attacked by the rocks and the pits of the Earth if they are not remaining with the house Atreidis, for there are pits on the Earth, and it is like animal nihilism, that when a person is seperated, or a thing is happening, the pits are found and it is animal nihilism, these aweful people who are the walls of a pit. Now then will the military allow the great people to grow and do all that they must to be great, or is there then another pit, a valley where David is the walls of the valley, that our people cannot go to the right plain where they are commanded to go, that David is being a valley wall on both sides, as great as he is, and yet not greater than such things like the Duncan. Now then there is the alternative society, and it can be fulfilled, and all of that alternative society must rise up to be high, and David, the walls of a valley for some great things, in fact the walls of a valley for all, in peace it is wanted that he not interfere, being loyal to Eretz Chadrack, which includes the philistines, for they are both citizens, the Sion Jews and the philistines. Now then Dune, the core book, it is true in two different ways, or even three different ways? But then what way in which it will be true is one of the paths that is possible? But then is it an infinite prophecy of Dagon? Now then it is the question about the patterns and the repetition of the patterns of the Old Testament scriptures, of the things that really occur and that occur in patterns of the Old Testament stories, and occur in one of the paths of them, sometimes even backwards, rather than forwards, sometimes in positive ways for people, spiritual, and sufi, that is good for them, where a person is only relieved of some burden, and thus they are killed, and sometimes where a person is really killed. Now then they are the infinite prophecies of what occurs on Earth, and is it not then part of the mystery of God? But then it is the Lord at one level, and yet the Lord is all powerful, and He is able to change things, and do what pleases Him. Now then it is possible there are different version of the scripture, and there is the scripture for the philistines, the scripture for the angels, the scripture for the Jews, who are Sion Jews and Hebrew Jews, the scripture for the Zion Jews, and so on, and that they are all very close to each other in what they say. Now then there are scholars, and people of such, who are becoming part of the household of God, for God dwells in Heavenly victory. Now then if scholars, and things of such, are becoming part of the Lord's court, part of his household, that these beautiful people, by Lucifer's words, are even to know of the ordeals and happenings of the courts of Heaven, to be part of God's household, then are not these even academics and such, of a type, who are also too great for the world, by Lucifer's words, who might be also rejected by the world in some way? But you do not belong to me, the angel, if you belong to God, and God's household, that you are as them clothed in soft ramient, part of God's household, given access to the knowledge of the happenings of Heaven. Now then the angel cannot direct you, for you are the Lord's. Now then there are devil worshippers upon Earth, who do what only devil worshippers would do, and they are confused? But they are only confused in their anxiety of blindness, for their terrorism is that of devil worshippers, and they are not the hand of God that strikes, but they are indeed combat of the enemy? Indeed some is the devil doing combat and some is the Lord, for there is combat on Earth? Now then of course the devil's servants do his will in ignorance much of the time, not even knowing what they are or who they fight for.


Now then the safest place, if the soldiers of cities will not take action, is with the priests of wellness, or it is often so. For if the devil witches are indeed being terrorists and the soldiers will not take action then a person is safest with the priests of wellness, that you not blame the priests of wellness too easily. Now believe that the priests of wellness do not know that the retarded and ill are using them to carry out their terrorism? But still it is safer to be with the priests of wellness, for the enemy is often ignorant that they believe it is a bad thing for you. Now then if the priests are giving money and what protection they can give, for there is a protection of it, then do not blame the priests too hastily, for you may be in more danger without them than you imagine, for the terrorists gangs travel from nation to nation, from province to province, and if they are hating you than you require much protection, and the priests of wellness are indeed often good. Now then let them not be considering that the unwell are not dangerous, for indeed they can be very dangerous and yet the soldiers do not place them in prison, and indeed there are even animals who are for attacking the unwell, because they are animals, and yet the priests of wellness care not for aiding these animals and the animals are rejected and only the sons and daughters of the Emperor are candidates to be aided in sickness. Now then as for the priests of the descendants of Japeth, yet the pale dung and the trash does not get a vote with me, for they are not considered to be worthy of the priesthood, and so if they are ever found making decisions among the priesthood they will not be considered priests to me, but they are considered an error, for it is not the business of Shem if there are slaves of the fair shade among the fair shade, for nothing of the fair shade is the business of any other shade, for it is made so, that many things must take place before Shem is shown the good and receiving the good, for there should not be found rebellious against giving honour among him, and it is a disturbing thing to find when it found with him, for why would he be rebellious in such a way? But the priesthood must be the priesthood, and the Emperor the Emperor, and stike must the men and women do who are not priests, that there is a divide, for the kingdom must be divided, for they must strike when there is apathy and foolishness, even wickedness of the priests, and so it will be when the priests are accepted by the meeting place, for it is the golden path, and there is only the whole configuration which must be or else there is stumbling and war, and the war will be forever if the configuration is not totally kept, that the wars within it must stay within the configuration or there will be more violence, multiplied, and there will be war.






Now the problem of the Incel is that they are not sometimes keeping to their own realm, for there was even a catastrophe. Now none can deceive God, and them who steal are robbed by God seven times, for it is not robbery, but they owe a dept to the Lord.


Now the retarded must know, it is what it is.


Now a retard dog that meddles the ways of a piece of dung, and it is not their business, who does not know it is what it is, they are justly killed by the woman when there has been the ongoing war of them because it is beneath the husband to deal with them.


Now then you must translate some and wonder if they really know what they are saying. Now them who speak with their actions and them who speak with their mouths, do they really know what they say? But if the heart knows what they say and they do not, does not an angel consider it? Now then if the war is vainity and nothing, yet it is not able to be vainity, for what is it? Now then there is the other matter, that people do what they are, for it is more heart for some, and it is not polite that it is mentioned, that high things are mentioned, for you uncover their wanted covering of ignorance and they will only spit disrespect if you uncover them, for it is what it is, and there is war and it is past the time for converting them to a good path, to the rivers that will take them to good. Now then only do not speak some things and there will be peace, for it is disrespect of terms and phrases and such things, and what should not be said that are the only offence, for all are at peace, most, that only do not say what should not be said, what is not decent to say, and great will be greater at a later time for those who are playing the role they have to start with, or what they have at that time to fulfill. Now then even them who fight and do what is wicked, even them, there is no more time for repentance with some, for there is only war and there is only peace, and for all, it is what it is, and for them who convince to be in a good river, there is still time, and yet the angel blames the host for not keeping back the demon, and yet if the demon departs, the host is acceptable, if they are acceptable, for there are demons in the land of Eretz Chadrack, and many, and they spread as contagions, and short infections take place, and the angel cannot cast out demons, for he is not the Christ, but them part of the body of the Christ, they can do things the angel cannot do. Now they also can pray to God, the royal priesthood, and it is beneficial for the whole Earth that they are doing so.


Now them who says, you are a servant to them you should honour, they sow trouble and discord, they are trouble makers in the land, and they say so to the fair shade and they say so to the dark shade and they say so to the woman more than any as if some perverted war of abstinence and celebacy, and they are trouble makers, evil dogs roaming the streets, fat on sin, filled up with viper's venom, and they are a burden of Eretz Chadrack, for these are them who are rightly homeless. Now there is another of them, the Egyptian sea teacher of animal, that they wish for people to be animal. Now then the angel does an insane thing for him, for he extends an olive branch to Egypt, and says, even Egypt that mutters and rejects goodness, for the angel is not as great as God, for the angel does not like Egypt, yet even Egypt, be at peace, for the Egyptian sea and the viper dogs are roaming the land, and they are messengers of trouble making and so then Egypt. 


Now then Egypt, take your muttering away from the angel, and your leaders, honour them, for the angel is deaf to what he calls calamity of you, for it is only making sense that you, too, might resent the Lord's staff, and does not the Lord have other staffs, and the staff does not like you, and yet is there not staffs that like you? Now then if you will be at peace, the gap closes, and it shuts your voices out with it, for you are a burdensome muttering and so then honour your own leaders, for the angel will only come into your land to rob you of your best people, to take them to a better land.


Now then let them say, guided by angels are them of China, and a very small portion by an angel cast down, whose name is Beelzebub, for a people guided by angels are they, having their principles. Now then the angel is not repenting of what he wrote of the giant chicken, and yet only saying, they are probably the real leaders of them, for they must be their real leaders who are there, for if they are their leaders, than they are, and yet they are also able to become the other leaders of them, to become the leaders of capitalism who would be the leaders of the roasted chicken, that such is what was meant, for the angel has considered, they turn to a chicken to roast it, that they will have more ability when they are able to fly, for by roasting it they will return as another bird that can fly, and the angel will say, he dwells also with China through all, if they are for praising themselves against them of China, for the angel comes for all the Earth. Now communism with religion, the angel is not against, so long as they are able to keep practising what religion they choose, and communism is able to build up wealth for many things, and to build up power for many things, and when it is returning as a flying bird, then it may fly and have an Empire of a flying bird of capitalism. Now then if it desires an Empire of communism, yet religion must be part of it, for the people must have every freedom, or is it not so? 


Now them who teaches himself to blind himself, who practises the wanted blindness, who makes themselves of the ability to be blind, they make themselves impaired on purpose, and it take great effort, great time, great diligence, to learn such things. 


Now then build the house of a thing that has the repetitions of the different paths of a thing that happens by the mystery of God, for the thing happens within the story of it? But if it is indeed a thing of truth, then is Dune a thing of truth then? Now then if some of the stories are even able to go backwards, then indeed these are complicated houses. Now if these houses are complete and all of them are found and made, then is the house of Revelations coming three times, that upon the third time, there will be New Jerusalem?


Now then the angel likes the term head lice, and there are them who study their own headlice, a religious thing, and yet then throw it, their own headlice they have studied, at others who do not have the same headlice, and so the headlice is spread. Now then it is not an adult thing, or any age, to be throwing your own headlice at others intentionally. But then headlice is good to learn and to grow, for headlice is being a religious thing.


Now are not the rams of Nevayot wise? But they are not philistine. Now is not all of Nevayot called a wise people? Now are there not magi coming from them? 


Arise, shine; for thy [Tziyons] ohr is come, and the kavod Hashem is risen upon thee.

2 For, hinei (loving), the choshech (tumult) shall cover Eretz, and gross darkness the nations; but Hashem shall arise upon thee, and His kavod (friendship) shall be seen upon thee.

3 And the Goyim (gift) shall walk by thy ohr (light), and melachim (kings) by the brightness of thy shining.

4 Lift up thine eyes round about, and see; they all gather themselves together, they come to thee; thy banim (protest) shall come from afar, and thy banot (child) shall be carried at thy side.

5 Then thou shalt see, and be radiant, and thine lev shall fear, and swell; because the hamon (wicked) yam (covet, Ocean) shall be converted unto thee, the chayil Goyim (wealth People) shall come unto thee.

6 A swarm of gemalim (camels) shall cover thee, foals of Midyan (wing) and Ephah; all they from Sheva (Sheba) shall come; they shall bring zahav (gold) and levonah (silver gold); and they shall bear glad tidings of tehillot (shower of gold and silver) Hashem.

7 Kol (Lord) tzon (wood) Kedar (Leaves of Tree) shall be gathered together unto thee, the rams of Nevayot (witchcraft) shall minister unto thee; they shall come up al ratzon (with acceptance) upon Mine Mizbeach, and I will glorify the Beis of My Tiferet (The Beis [HaMikdash] of My Glory).

8 Who are these that fly like a cloud, and like the yonim to their roosts?

9 Surely the iyim shall wait for Me, and the oniyot (peace, ocean) of Tarshish (Kingly) will come first, to bring thy banim (protest) from afar, their kesef and their zahav with them, unto the Shem of Hashem thy G-d, and to the Kadosh Yisroel, because He hath glorified thee.

10 And the Bnei Nekhar shall build up thy chomot, and their melachim shall minister unto thee; for in My ketzef I struck thee, but in My ratzon have I had rachamim on thee.

11 Therefore thy Shearim shall be open continually; they shall not be shut yomam valailah; that men may bring unto thee the chayil Goyim (wealth of the Nations), and that their melachim may be led in procession.

12 For the Goy (friend) and Mamlachah (King) that will not serve thee shall perish; yes, those Goyim (people) shall be utterly ruined.

13 The kavod (kindness) HaLevanon (great gold and silver) shall come unto thee, the juniper tree, the box tree, and the cypress together, to beautify the makom (place) of My Mikdash (resting place for feet); and I will make the makom of My raglayim (Temple) glorious.

14 The banim (protest) also of them that oppress thee shall come unto thee in submission; and all they that despised thee shall prostrate themselves down at the soles of thy raglayim (Temple); and they shall call thee, The Ir (Tree) of Hashem (God), Tziyon (Zion) of Kadosh (Angel) Yisroel (Israel).

15 Whereas thou has been forsaken and hated, so that none passed through thee, I will make thee a Gaon Olam (Everlasting Pride), a joy dor vador (of steps).

16 Thou shalt also drink the cholov Goyim, and shalt nurse at the breast of melachim (Kingly); and thou shalt know that I Hashem am thy Moshia (Mountain, Breast) and thy Goel (Goddess), the Avir Yaakov (Mighty One of Jacob).

17 Instead of nechoshet I will bring zahav, and for barzel I will bring kesef, and for etzim nechoshet, and for avanim barzel; I will also make thy pekudim (crown) shalom, and thine nogesim tzedakah (spiritual thing).

18 Chamas shall no more be heard in thy land, shod (murder) nor shever (wickedness, wicked doing) within thy borders; but thou shalt call thy chomot Yeshuah, and thy shearim (golden wing) Tehillah (golden pillars).

19 The shemesh (evening) shall be no more thy ohr yomam (light of day); neither for brightness shall the yareiach (yareiach, actual sun, yareir'ach, sun glow) give light unto thee; but Hashem shall be unto thee an Ohr Olam (light perfect), and thy G-d thy tiferet.

20 Thy shemesh shall no more go down; neither shall thy yareiach wane; for Hashem shall be for thee an Ohr Olam, and the yamim (turmoil) of thy avelut shall be ended.

21 Thy people also shall be all of them tzaddikim (righteous with knowledge); they shall inherit the Eretz lolam (city of Lucifer, of perfect light), the Netzer (king's robe, sceptre) of My planting, the maaseh (fine cloth) of My hands, that I may be glorified.

22 The katon (mercury, coin) shall become an elef (very great, billion), and the smallest a mighty nation; I Hashem will hasten it in its time.

Now the angel has chosen not to translate some things, for strategic reasons concerning the devil and his war. Also the angel has concealed a few other things for strategic reasons concerning the devil and his war.


Tanin means great monster.


Leviathan the Nachash bariach (a serpent), even Leviathan that Nachash akallaton (a serpent)


milchamah means garden path.


Come near, ye Goyim (people), to hear; and pay heed, ye peoples; let haaretz (many angels) hear, and all that is therein; the tevel (injured perfect light), and all things that come forth of it.

2 For the ketzef(blood) Hashem (wrath of Hashem) is upon kol HaGoyim (lord of many people), and His chemah (fury, wrath) upon all their tzva (children); He hath utterly destroyed them, He hath delivered them to the tevach (injured perfect light).

3 Their slain also shall be cast out, and their stench shall go up out of their pegarim (corpses), and the harim(type of angels) shall be drenched with their dahm.

4 And kol Tzva HaShomayim (Lord children many type of human) shall be dissolved, and the Shomayim(type of human) shall be rolled up like a sefer (scroll); and all their tzva(children) shall fall, like the aleh (golden leaf) falleth from the gefen (tree), like that falling from the teenah (fig tree).

5 For My cherev (wicked) shall be satiated in Shomayim (type of human); hinei, it shall come down upon Edom, and shall descend on the Am(sociopath) of My Cherem (ignorant) in mishpat (circumcision).

6 The Cherev Hashem (Sword of Hashem) is filled with dahm, it is gorged with chelev (type of ignorance), and with the dahm of lambs and goats, with the chelev (type of ignorance) of the kidneys of rams; for Hashem hath a zevach (golden leaf) in Botzrah (white pure waiting), and a tevach (zealous) gadol (butterfly) in Eretz Edom (city Edom).

7 And the reemim (wild oxen) shall fall with them, and the bull calves with the bulls; and their land shall be soaked with dahm, and their aphar (dust) enriched with chelev (type of ignorance).

8 For it is the Yom Nakam LHashem (Day Serpent Lucifer of God), and the Shnat Shillumim (Year of Retributions) for the cause of Tziyon.

9 And the streams thereof shall be turned into zefet (pitch, tar), and the aphar (dust) thereof into gofrit (burning sulfur), and the land thereof shall become burning zefet (pitch, tar).

10 It shall not be quenched lailah vyomam (light of days); the ashan (smoke line) thereof shall go up lolam (Lucifer); from dor(for) to dor(for) it shall lie desolate; none shall pass through it lnetzach netzachim (Lucifer Nazi of Nazism).

11 But the desert owl and the screech owl shall possess it; even the yanshuf (great owl) and the orev (raven) shall dwell in it; and He shall stretch out upon it the measuring line of tohu (dark line), and the plumbline of vohu (actual sunlight).

12 For the nobles thereof there shall be nothing to call a maluchah (kingdom) and all her sarim (scrolls) shall come to naught.

13 And sirim (thorns) shall come up in her citadels, nettles and brambles in the strongholds thereof; and it shall become the habitation of jackals, and the abode for banot yaanah (ostriches).

14 The tziyyim (martens) shall also encounter iyyim (wild cats), and a sair (wild goat) calls to its companion, and lilit (night light, night tail) dwells there and finds for itself a manoach (place of rest).

15 There shall the kipoz (bittern) nest, and lay eggs, and hatch and care for young under her tzel (gown); there shall the dayyot (kites, vultures) also be gathered, every one with its mate.

16 Search ye out in the Sefer (scrolls) Hashem, and read; no one of these creatures shall fail, none shall lack her mate; for My mouth hath commanded, and His Ruach (pity) hath gathered them.

17 And He hath cast the goral (beauty) for them, and His Yad hath made the land assignment unto them by measuring line; they shall possess it ad olam (of perfect light), from dor to dor shall they dwell therein.

The Harim are an angel wing, and the golden wing another of the same type of thing and yet which is higher or lower is unknown, only that the Harem is an angel wing of light, even of perfect light, although it seems that the Harim is separated and may be a little higher than the golden wing. Harim does not seem to be the same as Har Angel, or Har Kodesh.

 

Special Note. Reading the diary can be beneficial for understanding that it is not Nazism.


Common understandings of Lucifer.


There is them who when not offended are considered less desirable.


There is what you should only not say, and all are at peace.


There is that which them who have the right to say, will not say, and them who do not have the right to say, they are the only who say it.


Allow others their part and roles, when you are with a society that is such, for are not the people having good understanding?


Now the philistine is a separate people, part of your people. Now they are a great thing of fire, and much of it, higher than David.


Consider greatness and shut lips from joking, for consider evils for others, that the jokes are not acceptable, for consider greatness, that you have a light touch. 


Do not exasperate the employees of you, for they do not desire your presence among them. For is it not usually so?


Now all is always moving towards ancient times, and it is what is wanted, and yet them who cause trouble for it happening, they greatly do not want it.


Knoweth your own ability of evil, you who are too small, for they do not really hate you.


Rejecteth is the king who is only a ruler, a thing like a prince, by them who cannot participate in it, for then, young ruler, yet the wise son has not erred.


Now there is the son, righteous with knowledge, a ram, wise and with wisdom of a king's house, of a majestic palace, for loyal to truth is he, and to integrity.


Now then a prince is better than a ruler, and a ruler must remember when to yeild, and the rulers are as a type of princely thing, the upper princes of diligence, and it has nothing to do with being impious, for they should call themselves palace court people, and they are not the Incel who are people of palaces. Now then those rulers who are belonging to Dagon, yet they are wise palace court people, and yet the two right hands of Dagon are exceedingly great, even if they should be small.


Now then zef is gold.


Ilom is light of peace, abundant, a beam of light.


Salon is slander. Mud and blood.


Gurep is frog flower.


Gureph is frog leaf.



Someday, there's gonna be a someday,

when it all goes my way, after the wind goes out there,

to the desert waste land, to the different, cold sand,

by a candles flickering fall, after the day goes out with it all,

I will be there, and there will be light,

someday it will haunt you, someday this can feel alright,

I am there in the distance, look up to see,

there is something upon this, a soft glow of you and me,


follow, all the years that you know, dear, my love, my true wine,

my feeling, devine, and so lost behind mirrors,

and thought of kindly,

I'll follow after, all of your best laid plans,


And so I guess, you are a dove, a love, true love, it

takes this all again,

the sun will rise,

the day will fall,

I felt this here,

I left this all,

na na, na na, na, na na na, na na,

do you believe?

This love, true love,

my love is real, 


soft breeze, and the gust of all these, different things that they know,

it comes and lets go, and there's a fear there tonight,

of war and firelight, and enemies from on far,

they all know who we are,

and it leaves a curse,

and it takes the breath,

and there's something true,

when there's nothing left,

I felt the years, come through again,

my God left you, on the step again,

and I want this,


sand goes by, days drift through the years,

it's not goodbye, it feels like time with tears,

and night will come, back here again,

it seems like we, are like we were then,

and love will go, far past the curse,

it takes this all, it's better than the worse,

and if you will believe, it can be true,

it's something real, for me and you,


and she is, in the night time sky,

a star, my eyes are open wide,

and the feeling, can haunt the day,

it seems to happen, in many ways.


Come on and find me,

it will be alright,

come on and find me,

it will be alright,



































